Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.220

Temporary orders.

The court or judge may make any temporary orders in the cause or disposition of the party during the progress of the proceedings that justice may require. The custody of any party restrained may be changed from one person to another, by order of the court or judge.

[Code 1881 s 685; 1877 p 141 s 689; 1869 p 159 s 625; 1854 p 214 s 453; RRS s 1083.]